n11.dix
<pardef n="prakqwi/_n">
        <e><p>
                <l>yu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>geV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>gAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>goskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYigeV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigoskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ya deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYa deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ya</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>yeV</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYeV</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="AcAri/_n">
        <e><p>
                <l>yu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>geV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>gAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>goskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYigeV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigoskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ya deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYa deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ya</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>yeV</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYeV</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="prakqwi"><i>prakqwi</i><par n="prakqwi/_n"/></e>
<e lm="BUmi"><i>BUmi</i><par n="prakqwi/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mAwqBUmi"><i>mAwqBUmi</i><par n="prakqwi/_n"/></e>
<e lm="suraBi"><i>suraBi</i><par n="prakqwi/_n"/></e>
<e lm="pqWivi"><i>pqWivi</i><par n="prakqwi/_n"/></e>
<e lm="pqWvi"><i>pqWvi</i><par n="prakqwi/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vyaBicAri"><i>vyaBicAri</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vyApAri"><i>vyApAri</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="anubaMXi"><i>anubaMXi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="anuBAvi"><i>anuBAvi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="qRi"><i>qRi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="ASukavi"><i>ASukavi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="maMwravAxi"><i>maMwravAxi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="manIRi"><i>manIRi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="maharRi"><i>maharRi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mANi"><i>mANi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mAni"><i>mAni</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mAyAvi"><i>mAyAvi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mAravAdi"><i>mAravAdi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="muni"><i>muni</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="yAji"><i>yAji</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="yogi"><i>yogi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="risi"><i>risi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vajri"><i>vajri</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vAgxevi"><i>vAgxevi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="virahi"><i>virahi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vexi"><i>vexi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="saMnyAsi"><i>saMnyAsi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sawkavi"><i>sawkavi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sanyAsi"><i>sanyAsi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sahavarwi"><i>sahavarwi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sukavi"><i>sukavi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="senAXipawi"><i>senAXipawi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="senAni"><i>senAni</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="binnaNagArwi"><i>binnaNagArwi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="binnANagiwwi"><i>binnANagiwwi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="bIgawi"><i>bIgawi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="buraki"><i>buraki</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="Bagini"><i>Bagini</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="BAmini"><i>BAmini</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="BikRuki"><i>BikRuki</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="madaxi"><i>madaxi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="maxuvaNagiwwi"><i>maxuvaNagiwwi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="malawAyi"><i>malawAyi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mahadi"><i>mahadi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mahArANi"><i>mahArANi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mAwaMgi"><i>mAwaMgi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mAnasi"><i>mAnasi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mAnini"><i>mAnini</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mAyAvini"><i>mAyAvini</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mAyi"><i>mAyi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mArAywi"><i>mArAywi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mAlawi"><i>mAlawi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mAsawi"><i>mAsawi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mAswi"><i>mAswi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mitakalAdi"><i>mitakalAdi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="muxuki"><i>muxuki</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mUxevi"><i>mUxevi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mexini"><i>mexini</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="moVneVgAwi"><i>moVneVgAwi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mohanAMgi"><i>mohanAMgi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mohini"><i>mohini</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="yakRi"><i>yakRi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="yakRiNi"><i>yakRiNi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="yajamAnawi"><i>yajamAnawi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="yajamAni"><i>yajamAni</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="yuvawi"><i>yuvawi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="yogini"><i>yogini</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="rakkasi"><i>rakkasi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="ramaNi"><i>ramaNi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="rANi"><i>rANi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="rUpavawi"><i>rUpavawi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="rUpasi"><i>rUpasi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="lakki"><i>lakki</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="lakRmi"><i>lakRmi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="lawAMgi"><i>lawAMgi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="laliwAMgi"><i>laliwAMgi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="leKaki"><i>leKaki</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vayini"><i>vayini</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vANi"><i>vANi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vAragiwwi"><i>vAragiwwi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vAhini"><i>vAhini</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="virahiNi"><i>virahiNi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vEni"><i>vEni</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vyaBicAriNi"><i>vyaBicAriNi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="SAkini"><i>SAkini</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="SAsaki"><i>SAsaki</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="SiromaNi"><i>SiromaNi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="SrImawi"><i>SrImawi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="Rodasi"><i>Rodasi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="saKi"><i>saKi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sawi"><i>sawi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sarasvawi"><i>sarasvawi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="savawi"><i>savawi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sahaXarmi"><i>sahaXarmi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sahaXarmiNi"><i>sahaXarmiNi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sahAXyAyi"><i>sahAXyAyi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sahoxari"><i>sahoxari</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sImaMwini"><i>sImaMwini</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="suMxari"><i>suMxari</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sukumAri"><i>sukumAri</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sumawi"><i>sumawi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="suvAsini"><i>suvAsini</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sUlagiwwi"><i>sUlagiwwi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sevaki"><i>sevaki</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="soVbagi"><i>soVbagi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="soxari"><i>soxari</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sOBAgyavawi"><i>sOBAgyavawi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="hadaxi"><i>hadaxi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="hAxaragiwwi"><i>hAxaragiwwi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="hudugi"><i>hudugi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="heVMdawi"><i>heVMdawi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="heVggadawi"><i>heVggadawi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="hoVlawi"><i>hoVlawi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="kavi"><i>kavi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="kAmi"><i>kAmi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="kukavi"><i>kukavi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="cakravarwi"><i>cakravarwi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="jAdamAli"><i>jAdamAli</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="wejasvi"><i>wejasvi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="xuRkarmi"><i>xuRkarmi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="pawi"><i>pawi</i><par n="AcAri/_n"/></e>
